sk_SK-lemma/sk_SK.aff
FLAG num
SFX 3251 N 1
SFX 3251 soký šším .
SFX 3252 N 1
SFX 3252 soký šších .
SFX 3253 N 1
SFX 3253 soký ššími .
SFX 3254 N 1
SFX 3254 soký ššie .
SFX 3255 N 1
SFX 3255 soký ššia .
SFX 3256 N 1
SFX 3256 soký ššej .
SFX 3257 N 1
SFX 3257 soký ššiu .
SFX 3258 N 1
SFX 3258 soký ššou .
SFX 3259 Y 1
SFX 3259 soký šší .
PFX 3259 Y 1
PFX 3259 0 naj .
SFX 3260 Y 1
SFX 3260 soký ššieho .
PFX 3260 Y 1
PFX 3260 0 naj .
SFX 3261 Y 1
SFX 3261 soký ššiemu .
PFX 3261 Y 1
PFX 3261 0 naj .
SFX 3262 Y 1
SFX 3262 soký ššom .
PFX 3262 Y 1
PFX 3262 0 naj .
SFX 3263 Y 1
SFX 3263 soký šším .
PFX 3263 Y 1
PFX 3263 0 naj .
SFX 3264 Y 1
SFX 3264 soký šších .
PFX 3264 Y 1
PFX 3264 0 naj .
SFX 3265 Y 1
SFX 3265 soký ššími .
PFX 3265 Y 1
PFX 3265 0 naj .
SFX 3266 Y 1
SFX 3266 soký ššie .
PFX 3266 Y 1
PFX 3266 0 naj .
SFX 3267 Y 1
SFX 3267 soký ššia .
PFX 3267 Y 1
PFX 3267 0 naj .
SFX 3268 Y 1
SFX 3268 soký ššej .
PFX 3268 Y 1
PFX 3268 0 naj .
SFX 3269 Y 1
SFX 3269 soký ššiu .
PFX 3269 Y 1
PFX 3269 0 naj .
SFX 3270 Y 1
SFX 3270 soký ššou .
PFX 3270 Y 1
PFX 3270 0 naj .
SFX 3271 N 1
SFX 3271 yza ýz .
SFX 3272 N 1
SFX 3272 ôl olovi .
SFX 3273 N 1
SFX 3273 s ššie .
SFX 3274 Y 1
SFX 3274 s ššie .
PFX 3274 Y 1
PFX 3274 0 naj .
SFX 3275 Y 1
SFX 3275 a 0 .
PFX 3275 Y 1
PFX 3275 vď vdi .
SFX 3276 N 1
SFX 3276 ok kých .
SFX 3277 N 1
SFX 3277 ok kým .
SFX 3278 N 1
SFX 3278 ok kými .
SFX 3279 N 1
SFX 3279 ok kej .
SFX 3280 N 1
SFX 3280 ok kou .
SFX 3281 N 1
SFX 3281 ok kého .
SFX 3282 N 1
SFX 3282 ok kému .
SFX 3283 N 1
SFX 3283 ok ko .
SFX 3284 N 1
SFX 3284 o ého .
SFX 3285 N 1
SFX 3285 o ému .
PFX 3286 N 1
PFX 3286 zl horši .
PFX 3287 N 1
PFX 3287 zl najhorši .
SFX 3288 N 1
SFX 3288 zlý horší .
SFX 3289 N 1
SFX 3289 zlý horšieho .
SFX 3290 N 1
SFX 3290 zlý horšiemu .
SFX 3291 N 1
SFX 3291 zlý horšom .
SFX 3292 N 1
SFX 3292 zlý horším .
SFX 3293 N 1
SFX 3293 zlý horších .
SFX 3294 N 1
SFX 3294 zlý horšími .
SFX 3295 N 1
SFX 3295 zlý horšie .
SFX 3296 N 1
SFX 3296 zlý horšia .
SFX 3297 N 1
SFX 3297 zlý horšej .
SFX 3298 N 1
SFX 3298 zlý horšiu .
SFX 3299 N 1
SFX 3299 zlý horšou .
SFX 3300 N 1
SFX 3300 zlý najhorší .
SFX 3301 N 1
SFX 3301 zlý najhoršieho .
SFX 3302 N 1
SFX 3302 zlý najhoršiemu .
SFX 3303 N 1
SFX 3303 zlý najhoršom .
SFX 3304 N 1
SFX 3304 zlý najhorším .
SFX 3305 N 1
SFX 3305 zlý najhorších .
SFX 3306 N 1
SFX 3306 zlý najhoršími .
SFX 3307 N 1
SFX 3307 zlý najhoršie .
SFX 3308 N 1
SFX 3308 zlý najhoršia .
SFX 3309 N 1
SFX 3309 zlý najhoršej .
SFX 3310 N 1
SFX 3310 zlý najhoršiu .
SFX 3311 N 1
SFX 3311 zlý najhoršou .
SFX 3312 Y 1
SFX 3312 ť m .
PFX 3312 Y 1
PFX 3312 zm zme .
SFX 3313 Y 1
SFX 3313 ť š .
PFX 3313 Y 1
PFX 3313 zm zme .
SFX 3314 Y 1
SFX 3314 ť 0 .
PFX 3314 Y 1
PFX 3314 zm zme .
SFX 3315 Y 1
SFX 3315 ť me .
PFX 3315 Y 1
PFX 3315 zm zme .
SFX 3316 Y 1
SFX 3316 ť te .
PFX 3316 Y 1
PFX 3316 zm zme .
SFX 3317 N 1
SFX 3317 uva úv .
SFX 3318 N 1
SFX 3318 rno ŕn .
SFX 3319 Y 1
SFX 3319 ka iek .
PFX 3319 Y 1
PFX 3319 zv vz .
SFX 3320 Y 1
SFX 3320 a 0 .
PFX 3320 Y 1
PFX 3320 zľ zli .
SFX 3321 Y 1
SFX 3321 o 0 .
PFX 3321 Y 1
PFX 3321 0 i .
SFX 3322 N 1
SFX 3322 úzko užšie .
SFX 3323 N 1
SFX 3323 úzko najužšie .
SFX 3324 N 1
SFX 3324 úzky užší .
SFX 3325 N 1
SFX 3325 úzky užšieho .
SFX 3326 N 1
SFX 3326 úzky užšiemu .
SFX 3327 N 1
SFX 3327 úzky užšom .
SFX 3328 N 1
SFX 3328 úzky užším .
SFX 3329 N 1
SFX 3329 úzky užších .
SFX 3330 N 1
SFX 3330 úzky užšími .
SFX 3331 N 1
SFX 3331 úzky užšie .
SFX 3332 N 1
SFX 3332 úzky užšia .
SFX 3333 N 1
SFX 3333 úzky užšej .
SFX 3334 N 1
SFX 3334 úzky užšiu .
SFX 3335 N 1
SFX 3335 úzky užšou .
SFX 3336 N 1
SFX 3336 úzky najužší .
SFX 3337 N 1
SFX 3337 úzky najužšieho .
SFX 3338 N 1
SFX 3338 úzky najužšiemu .
SFX 3339 N 1
SFX 3339 úzky najužšom .
SFX 3340 N 1
SFX 3340 úzky najužším .
SFX 3341 N 1
SFX 3341 úzky najužších .
SFX 3342 N 1
SFX 3342 úzky najužšími .
SFX 3343 N 1
SFX 3343 úzky najužšie .
SFX 3344 N 1
SFX 3344 úzky najužšia .
SFX 3345 N 1
SFX 3345 úzky najužšej .
SFX 3346 N 1
SFX 3346 úzky najužšiu .
SFX 3347 N 1
SFX 3347 úzky najužšou .
SFX 3348 Y 1
SFX 3348 a 0 .
PFX 3348 Y 1
PFX 3348 č či .
SFX 3349 Y 1
SFX 3349 o 0 .
PFX 3349 Y 1
PFX 3349 č či .
SFX 3350 Y 1
SFX 3350 y 0 .
PFX 3350 Y 1
PFX 3350 č či .
PFX 3351 N 1
PFX 3351 č či .
SFX 3352 N 1
SFX 3352 česť cti .
SFX 3353 Y 1
SFX 3353 0 ou .
PFX 3353 Y 1
PFX 3353 čes c .
SFX 3354 N 1
SFX 3354 česť ctí .
SFX 3355 N 1
SFX 3355 česť ctiam .
SFX 3356 N 1
SFX 3356 česť ctiach .
SFX 3357 Y 1
SFX 3357 0 ami .
PFX 3357 Y 1
PFX 3357 čes c .
SFX 3358 Y 1
SFX 3358 o ejšie .
PFX 3358 Y 1
PFX 3358 či č .
SFX 3359 Y 1
SFX 3359 o ejšie .
PFX 3359 Y 1
PFX 3359 či najč .
SFX 3360 Y 1
SFX 3360 y ejší .
PFX 3360 Y 1
PFX 3360 či č .
SFX 3361 Y 1
SFX 3361 y ejšieho .
PFX 3361 Y 1
PFX 3361 či č .
SFX 3362 Y 1
SFX 3362 y ejšiemu .
PFX 3362 Y 1
PFX 3362 či č .
SFX 3363 Y 1
SFX 3363 y ejšom .
PFX 3363 Y 1
PFX 3363 či č .
SFX 3364 Y 1
SFX 3364 y ejším .
PFX 3364 Y 1
PFX 3364 či č .
SFX 3365 Y 1
SFX 3365 y ejších .
PFX 3365 Y 1
PFX 3365 či č .
SFX 3366 Y 1
SFX 3366 y ejšími .
PFX 3366 Y 1
PFX 3366 či č .
SFX 3367 Y 1
SFX 3367 y ejšie .
PFX 3367 Y 1
PFX 3367 či č .
SFX 3368 Y 1
SFX 3368 y ejšia .
PFX 3368 Y 1
PFX 3368 či č .
SFX 3369 Y 1
SFX 3369 y ejšej .
PFX 3369 Y 1
PFX 3369 či č .
SFX 3370 Y 1
SFX 3370 y ejšiu .
PFX 3370 Y 1
PFX 3370 či č .
SFX 3371 Y 1
SFX 3371 y ejšou .
PFX 3371 Y 1
PFX 3371 či č .
SFX 3372 Y 1
SFX 3372 y ejší .
PFX 3372 Y 1
PFX 3372 či najč .
SFX 3373 Y 1
SFX 3373 y ejšieho .
PFX 3373 Y 1
PFX 3373 či najč .
SFX 3374 Y 1
SFX 3374 y ejšiemu .
PFX 3374 Y 1
PFX 3374 či najč .
SFX 3375 Y 1
SFX 3375 y ejšom .
PFX 3375 Y 1
PFX 3375 či najč .
SFX 3376 Y 1
SFX 3376 y ejším .
PFX 3376 Y 1
PFX 3376 či najč .
SFX 3377 Y 1
SFX 3377 y ejších .
PFX 3377 Y 1
PFX 3377 či najč .
SFX 3378 Y 1
SFX 3378 y ejšími .
PFX 3378 Y 1
PFX 3378 či najč .
SFX 3379 Y 1
SFX 3379 y ejšie .
PFX 3379 Y 1
PFX 3379 či najč .
SFX 3380 Y 1
SFX 3380 y ejšia .
PFX 3380 Y 1
PFX 3380 či najč .
SFX 3381 Y 1
SFX 3381 y ejšej .
PFX 3381 Y 1
PFX 3381 či najč .
SFX 3382 Y 1
SFX 3382 y ejšiu .
PFX 3382 Y 1
PFX 3382 či najč .
SFX 3383 Y 1
SFX 3383 y ejšou .
PFX 3383 Y 1
PFX 3383 či najč .
SFX 3384 Y 1
SFX 3384 vek m .
PFX 3384 Y 1
PFX 3384 čl ľuď .
SFX 3385 Y 1
SFX 3385 vek ch .
PFX 3385 Y 1
PFX 3385 čl ľuď .
PFX 3386 N 1
PFX 3386 č čoh .
PFX 3387 N 1
PFX 3387 čo čomu .
PFX 3388 N 1
PFX 3388 čo čom .
PFX 3389 N 1
PFX 3389 čo čím .
SFX 3390 N 1
SFX 3390 si musi .
SFX 3391 Y 1
SFX 3391 a 0 .
PFX 3391 Y 1
PFX 3391 čr čri .
SFX 3392 Y 1
SFX 3392 y 0 .
PFX 3392 Y 1
PFX 3392 ču čú .
SFX 3393 N 1
SFX 3393 ry ier .
SFX 3394 N 1
SFX 3394 arga árg .
PFX 3395 N 1
PFX 3395 čí čie .
PFX 3396 N 1
PFX 3396 čí čích .
PFX 3397 N 1
PFX 3397 čí čím .
PFX 3398 N 1
PFX 3398 čí čími .
PFX 3399 N 1
PFX 3399 čí čia .
PFX 3400 N 1
PFX 3400 čí čej .
PFX 3401 N 1
PFX 3401 čí čiu .
PFX 3402 N 1
PFX 3402 čí čou .
PFX 3403 N 1
PFX 3403 čí čieho .
PFX 3404 N 1
PFX 3404 čí čiemu .
PFX 3405 N 1
PFX 3405 čí čom .
SFX 3406 N 1
SFX 3406 ko j .
SFX 3407 Y 1
SFX 3407 ko j .
PFX 3407 Y 1
PFX 3407 0 naj .
SFX 3408 N 1
SFX 3408 eko iek .
SFX 3409 N 1
SFX 3409 ia 0 .
SFX 3410 N 1
SFX 3410 via m .
SFX 3411 N 1
SFX 3411 via ch .
SFX 3412 N 1
SFX 3412 ovia ami .
SFX 3413 N 1
SFX 3413 á aa .
SFX 3414 N 1
SFX 3414 á au .
SFX 3415 N 1
SFX 3415 á ae .
SFX 3416 N 1
SFX 3416 á aá .
SFX 3417 N 1
SFX 3417 á iev .
SFX 3418 N 1
SFX 3418 á aám .
SFX 3419 N 1
SFX 3419 á aách .
SFX 3420 N 1
SFX 3420 á aami .
SFX 3421 Y 1
SFX 3421 a 0 .
PFX 3421 Y 1
PFX 3421 ša šá .
SFX 3422 Y 1
SFX 3422 y 0 .
PFX 3422 Y 1
PFX 3422 š ši .
SFX 3423 Y 1
SFX 3423 o 0 .
PFX 3423 Y 1
PFX 3423 š ši .
SFX 3424 Y 1
SFX 3424 ť tich .
PFX 3424 Y 1
PFX 3424 š ši .
SFX 3425 Y 1
SFX 3425 ť tim .
PFX 3425 Y 1
PFX 3425 š ši .
SFX 3426 Y 1
SFX 3426 ť timi .
PFX 3426 Y 1
PFX 3426 š ši .
SFX 3427 Y 1
SFX 3427 ť ti .
PFX 3427 Y 1
PFX 3427 š ši .
SFX 3428 N 1
SFX 3428 ev va .
SFX 3429 N 1
SFX 3429 ev vu .
SFX 3430 N 1
SFX 3430 ev ve .
SFX 3431 N 1
SFX 3431 ev vom .
SFX 3432 N 1
SFX 3432 ev vy .
SFX 3433 N 1
SFX 3433 ev vov .
SFX 3434 N 1
SFX 3434 ev voch .
SFX 3435 Y 1
SFX 3435 a 0 .
PFX 3435 Y 1
PFX 3435 ši ší .
SFX 3436 N 1
SFX 3436 í ého .
SFX 3437 N 1
SFX 3437 í ému .
SFX 3438 N 1
SFX 3438 í á .
SFX 3439 N 1
SFX 3439 í ú .
SFX 3440 N 1
SFX 3440 umpa úmp .
SFX 3441 Y 1
SFX 3441 a 0 .
PFX 3441 Y 1
PFX 3441 šli šlí .
SFX 3442 N 1
SFX 3442 ajza ájz .
SFX 3443 N 1
SFX 3443 auba áub .
SFX 3444 N 1
SFX 3444 ňa nce .
SFX 3445 N 1
SFX 3445 ňa niec .
SFX 3446 N 1
SFX 3446 ňa ncom .
SFX 3447 N 1
SFX 3447 ňa ncoch .
SFX 3448 N 1
SFX 3448 ňa ncami .
SFX 3449 N 1
SFX 3449 vec evca .
SFX 3450 N 1
SFX 3450 vec evcovi .
SFX 3451 N 1
SFX 3451 vec evcom .
SFX 3452 N 1
SFX 3452 vec evci .
SFX 3453 N 1
SFX 3453 vec evcov .
SFX 3454 N 1
SFX 3454 vec evcoch .
SFX 3455 N 1
SFX 3455 vec evcami .
SFX 3456 Y 1
SFX 3456 a 0 .
PFX 3456 Y 1
PFX 3456 šľ šli .
SFX 3457 Y 1
SFX 3457 a 0 .
PFX 3457 Y 1
PFX 3457 šľa šľá .
SFX 3458 Y 1
SFX 3458 a 0 .
PFX 3458 Y 1
PFX 3458 šť šti .
SFX 3459 Y 1
SFX 3459 a 0 .
PFX 3459 Y 1
PFX 3459 ť ti .
SFX 3460 Y 1
SFX 3460 a 0 .
PFX 3460 Y 1
PFX 3460 ž ži .
SFX 3461 N 1
SFX 3461 rnda ŕnd .
SFX 3462 N 1
SFX 3462 ezo iez .
SFX 3463 N 1
SFX 3463 re er .
SFX 3464 N 1
SFX 3464 re ier .
SFX 3465 N 1
SFX 3465 en neho .
SFX 3466 N 1
SFX 3466 en nemu .
SFX 3467 N 1
SFX 3467 en nym .
SFX 3468 N 1
SFX 3468 en nych .
SFX 3469 N 1
SFX 3469 en nymi .
SFX 3470 N 1
SFX 3470 ľava liav .
SFX 3471 N 1
SFX 3471 nec enca .
SFX 3472 N 1
SFX 3472 nec encovi .
SFX 3473 N 1
SFX 3473 nec encom .
SFX 3474 N 1
SFX 3474 nec enci .
SFX 3475 N 1
SFX 3475 nec encov .
SFX 3476 N 1
SFX 3476 nec encoch .
SFX 3477 N 1
SFX 3477 nec encami .
SFX 3478 Y 1
SFX 3478 a 0 .
PFX 3478 Y 1
PFX 3478 žu žú .
SFX 3479 Y 1
SFX 3479 a 0 .
PFX 3479 Y 1
PFX 3479 žľ žli .
